Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 10 Vital Records
31-10-26.
Issuance of certified copies of vital records, voluntary acknowledgments of paternity, voluntary acknowledgments of legitimation; certificates; use for statistical purposes; transmittal of records out of state; use for commercial or speculative purposes.

In accordance with Code Section 31-10-25 and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto:

The state registrar or local custodian, upon receipt of a written application, shall issue:

A certified copy of a vital record in that registrar’s or custodian’s custody or abstract thereof to any applicant having a direct and tangible interest in the vital record;

Certified copies of voluntary acknowledgments of paternity as provided in subsection (e) of Code Section 19-7-46.1;

Certified copies of voluntary acknowledgments of legitimation executed on or before June 30, 2015, to the same individuals and entities specified in subsection (e) of Code Section 19-7-46.1; and

Certified copies of certificates to:

The person whose record of birth is registered;

Either parent, guardian, or temporary guardian of the person whose record of birth or death is registered;

The living legal spouse or next of kin, the legal representative, or the person who in good faith has applied and produced a record of such application to become the legal representative of the person whose record of birth or death is registered;

A court of competent jurisdiction upon its order or subpoena; or

Any governmental agency, state or federal, provided that such certificate shall be needed for official purposes; and

Each certified copy issued shall show the date of registration and duplicates issued from records marked “delayed” or “amended” shall be similarly marked and show the effective date. The documentary evidence used to establish a delayed certificate of birth shall be shown on all duplicates issued. All forms and procedures used in the issuance of certified copies of vital records in this state shall be provided or approved by the state registrar.

The federal agency responsible for national vital statistics may be furnished such duplicates or data from the system of vital records as it may require for national statistics, provided such federal agency shares in the cost of collecting, processing, and transmitting such data and provided further that such data shall not be used for other than statistical purposes by the federal agency unless so authorized by the state registrar.

The state registrar may, by agreement, transmit duplicates of records and other reports required by this chapter to offices of vital records outside this state when such records or other reports relate to residents of those jurisdictions or persons born in those jurisdictions. The agreement shall require that the duplicates be used for statistical and administrative purposes only and the agreement shall further provide for the retention and disposition of such duplicates. Duplicates received by the department from offices of vital statistics in other states shall be handled in the same manner as prescribed in this Code section.

No person shall prepare or issue any certificate which purports to be an original, certified copy or duplicate of a vital record except as authorized in this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter.

No duplicates or parts thereof of a vital record shall be reproduced or information copied for commercial or speculative purposes. This subsection shall not apply to published results of research.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 157, § 20; Ga. L. 1927, p. 353, § 20; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, §§ 16, 17; Ga. L. 1933, p. 7, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1212; Code 1933, § 88-1724, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 651, § 3; Ga. L. 1969, p. 715, § 2; Code 1933, § 88-1726, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-14

; Code 1981, §

31-10-26

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31; Ga. L. 2004, p. 477, § 9; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 43/HB 24; Ga. L. 2016, p. 304, § 17/SB 64.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 304, § 18/SB 64, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall not be construed to affect a voluntary acknowledgment of legitimation that was valid under the former provisions of Code Section 19-7-21.1, nor any of the rights or responsibilities flowing therefrom, if it was executed on or before June 30, 2016.”

Law reviews.

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

31-10-27.
Fees for copies or services.

The department shall prescribe uniform fees to be paid to the State Office of Vital Records, local registrars, and local custodians for certified copies of certificates or records, for a search of the files or records, for copies or information provided for research, statistical, or administrative purposes, or for other services. The fee for each search or service, certified copy, or record shall be determined by the board.

Fees collected by the department under this Code section shall be deposited in the general funds of the state.

Fees for copies or searches by local custodians of vital records shall be retained by them whether the local custodian is paid on a fee basis, a salary basis, or a combination of both, except in counties where the local custodian of vital records is an employee of the county board of health, in which case said fees shall be remitted monthly to the county health department.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 236, §§ 21, 22; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 140, § 11; Code 1933, § 88-1725, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 541, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1727, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-15

; Code 1981, §

31-10-27

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 477, § 10.

Cross references.

Providing of marital, birth, divorce, or death records free of charge to veterans, Veterans’ Administration, and others, §

38-1-1

.

31-10-28.
Institutions to keep vital records.

Every person in charge of an institution shall keep a record of personal data concerning each person admitted or confined to such institution. This record shall include such information as required for the certificates of birth and death and the reports of spontaneous fetal death and induced termination of pregnancy required by this chapter. The record shall be made at the time of admission from information provided by the person being admitted or confined but, when it cannot be so obtained, the information shall be obtained from relatives or other persons acquainted with the facts. The name and address of the person providing the information shall be a part of the record.

When a dead body or dead fetus is released or disposed of by an institution, the person in charge of the institution shall keep a record showing the name of the decedent or parents of the fetus, date of death, name and address of the person to whom the body or fetus is released, and the date of removal from the institution. If final disposition is made by the institution, the date, place, and manner of disposition shall also be recorded.

A funeral director, embalmer, sexton, or other person who removes from the place of death, transports, or makes final disposition of a dead body or fetus, in addition to filing any certificate or other report required by this chapter or regulations promulgated hereunder, shall keep a record which shall identify the body and such information pertaining to receipt, removal, delivery, burial, or cremation of such body as may be required by regulations adopted by the department.

Records maintained under this Code section shall be retained for a period of not less than three years and shall be made available for inspection by the state registrar or the state registrar’s representative upon demand.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 353, § 11; Code 1933, § 88-1220; Ga. L. 1945, p. 236, § 26; Code 1933, § 88-1726, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1728, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-10

; Code 1981, §

31-10-28

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, a comma was inserted following “institution” near the beginning of subsection (b).

31-10-29.
Privileged nature of disclosures; notification of local registrar of institutional deaths and fetal deaths; notification of board of voting registrars of adult deaths.

Any person having knowledge or facts concerning any birth, death, spontaneous fetal death, marriage, induced termination of pregnancy, divorce, dissolution of marriage, or annulment may disclose such facts to the state registrar, and such disclosure shall be absolutely privileged and no cause or action may be brought or maintained against such person for such disclosure.

Not later than the tenth day of the month following the month of occurrence, the administrator of each institution or that administrator’s designated representative shall send to the local vital records registrar a list showing all deaths and fetal deaths occurring in that institution during the preceding month.

Upon receipt of a death certificate by any local vital records registrar of any person 18 years of age or older, the local registrar shall notify the board of voting registrars in the county of the decedent’s residence of the name and address of such decedent. If the records of the local registrar reflect that the decedent was a resident of another or other counties within the five years preceding the decedent’s death, the local registrar shall also send such information to the board of voting registrars of such county or counties.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1729, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-29

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 31; Ga. L. 1991, p. 669, § 8.

31-10-30.
Posting facts of death to birth certificates.

To protect the integrity of vital records and to prevent the fraudulent use of birth certificates of deceased persons, the state registrar is authorized to match birth and death certificates, in accordance with written standards promulgated by the state registrar to prove beyond a reasonable doubt the fact of death and to post the facts of death to the appropriate birth certificate and index. Copies issued from birth certificates marked deceased shall be similarly marked.

When a death occurs in this state for which a death certificate must be filed in accordance with Code Section 31-10-15, and the decedent’s birth certificate is on file at the State Office of Vital Records, the state registrar shall mark that deceased person’s birth certificate with the word “Deceased.” The state registrar shall notify the custodian of vital records of the county where the decedent was born that the deceased individual’s birth certificate has been marked “Deceased.”

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1730, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-30

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1201, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section §

28-9-5

, in 2019, “State Office of Vital Records” was substituted for “state office of vital records” in subsection (b).

31-10-31.
Penalties.

A fine of not more than $10,000.00 or imprisonment of not more than five years, or both, shall be imposed on:

Any person who willfully and knowingly makes any false statement in a certificate, record, or report required by this chapter, or in an application for an amendment thereof, or in an application for a certified copy of a vital record or who willfully and knowingly supplies false information intending that such information be used in the preparation of any such report, record, or certificate, or amendment thereof;

Any person who without lawful authority and with the intent to deceive makes, counterfeits, alters, amends, or mutilates any certificate, record, or report required by this chapter or a certified copy of such certificate, record, or report;

Any person who willfully and knowingly obtains, possesses, uses, sells, furnishes, or attempts to obtain, possess, use, sell, or furnish to another, for any purpose of deception, any certificate, record, or report required by this chapter or certified copy thereof so made, counterfeited, altered, amended, or mutilated or which is false in whole or in part or which relates to the birth of another person, whether living or deceased;

Any employee of the State Office of Vital Records, or appointed local registrar or local custodian or special abstracting agent who willfully and knowingly furnishes or processes a certificate of birth, or certified copy of a certificate of birth, with the knowledge or intention that it be used for the purposes of deception; or

Any person who without lawful authority possesses any certificate, record, or report required by this chapter or a copy or certified copy of such certificate, record, or report knowing same to have been stolen or otherwise unlawfully obtained.

A fine not more than $1,000.00 or imprisonment of not more than one year, or both, shall be imposed on:

Any person who willfully and knowingly refuses to provide information required by this chapter or regulations adopted hereunder;

Any person who willfully and knowingly transports or accepts for transportation, interment, or other disposition a dead body without an accompanying permit as provided in this chapter;

Any person who willfully and knowingly neglects or violates any of the provisions of this chapter or refuses to perform any of the duties imposed upon such person by this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 353, § 21; Code 1933, § 88-9929; Ga. L. 1945, p. 236, § 38; Code 1933, § 88-1727, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1731, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-16

; Code 1981, §

31-10-31

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 31; Ga. L. 2004, p. 477, § 11.

31-10-32.
Extension of periods for filing of certificates or reports.

The department may, by regulation and upon such conditions as it may prescribe to assure compliance with the purposes of this chapter, provide for the extension of the periods for the filing of certificates or reports.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1718, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1732, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-10-9

; Code 1981, §

31-10-32

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 723, § 2.

31-10-33.
Procedure for stillbirth.

For any stillborn child in this state, the State Office of Vital Records shall, within 60 days of a request by a parent named on a fetal death certificate or other eligible person as provided for in subsection (h) of this Code section, issue a certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth.

The person who is required to file a fetal death certificate under Code Section 31-10-18 shall advise the parent of a stillborn child:

That the parent may request the preparation of a certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth in addition to the fetal death certificate;

That the parent may obtain a certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth by contacting the State Office of Vital Records;

How the parent may contact the State Office of Vital Records to request a certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth; and

That a copy of the original certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth is a document that is available as a vital record when held by the state registrar system.

The request for a certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth shall be on a form prescribed by the state registrar pursuant to Code Section 31-10-7.

The certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth shall contain:

The date of the stillbirth;

The county in which the stillbirth occurred;

The name of the stillborn child as provided on the original or amended certificate of the fetal death certificate. If a name does not appear on the original or amended fetal death certificate and the requesting parent does not wish to provide a name, the State Office of Vital Records shall fill in the certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth with the name “baby boy” or “baby girl” and the last name of the parents;

The state file number of the corresponding fetal death certificate; and

The following statement: “This certificate is not proof of live birth.”

The certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth shall also contain:

Gender;

Place of delivery;

Residence of mother;

The attendant at delivery;

Gestational age at delivery;

Weight at delivery;

Mother’s name;

Father’s name;

Time of delivery; and

Type of delivery, including but not limited to single, twin, or triplet.

A certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth shall be a vital record when held by the state registrar system. The State Office of Vital Records shall inform any parent who requests a certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth that a copy of the document is available as a vital record.

A parent may request that the State Office of Vital Records issue a certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth regardless of the date on which the certificate of fetal death was issued.

Those individuals who are entitled to request a certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth are:

Either parent of the stillborn child listed on the vital record;

A grandparent of the stillborn child;

An adult brother or sister of the stillborn child;

A legal representative of the parent; and

A court of competent jurisdiction.

The State Office of Vital Records shall not use a certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth to calculate live birth statistics.

This Code section shall not be used to establish, bring, or support a civil cause of action seeking damages against any person or entity for bodily injury, personal injury, or wrongful death for a stillbirth.

The state registrar shall prescribe by rules pursuant to Code Section 31-10-5 the form, content, and process for the certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-10-33

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 585, § 3/SB 381.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 585, § 1/SB 381, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘No Heartbeat Act.’ ”